public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
abiàndome/G	po:verb is:gerund_simple is:interrogative_1s st:aver
reatu/O	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s st:reaver
scauso/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:scausar
ocèñomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:ocèñer
inkoncéñar/cE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
darme/G	po:verb is:infinitive_simple is:interrogative_1s st:dar
deu/Q	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_2p st:dar
dexdatu/O	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_2s st:dexdar
redàa/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:redar
redài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:redar
redame/H	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_1s st:redar
fai/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:far
konféa/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:konfar
konféu/Q	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_2p st:konfar
konfame/H	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_1s st:konfar
kontraféa/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:kontrafar
likuefarme/G	po:verb is:infinitive_simple is:interrogative_1s st:likuefar
ƚikuefaga/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:ƚikuefar
ƚikuefài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:ƚikuefar
putreféi/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:putrefar
putreféu/Q	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_2p st:putrefar
putrefame/H	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_1s st:putrefar
rarefatu/O	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_2s st:rarefar
refàa/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:refar
sorafài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:sorafar
strafàa/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:strafar
straféu/Q	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_2p st:strafar
strafame/H	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_1s st:strafar
torefarme/G	po:verb is:infinitive_simple is:interrogative_1s st:torefar
tumefaga/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:tumefar
tumefài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:tumefar
infiòko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:infiokar
frando/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:frànder
fritegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skaturo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:skaturar
ƚèxo/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ƚèxer st:ƚèxar
ƚuxíngomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:ƚuxingar
mareƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
demeso/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:deméter
porésimoi/M	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1p is:interrogative_1s st:poder
prexumerò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:prexúmer
reprimarò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:reprímar
sagànomi/gK	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_1s st:saganar
deseko/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:desekar
stame/H	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_1s st:star
statu/O	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_2s st:star
malstài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:malstar
malstéu/Q	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s is:interrogative_2p st:malstar
movestaga/FJLP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_1s_3 st:movestar
movestài/NP	po:verb is:subjunctive_present_2s st:movestar
kontrato/BI	po:verb is:participle_perfect_strong_1s st:kontràer
ŧekatredo/hEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:ŧekatredar
prosederò/cJL	po:verb is:indicative_future_1s st:proséder
rinvèño/cEJKL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:rinvèñer
vutu/O	po:verb is:indicative_present_2s is:interrogative_2s st:voler st:voƚer
revoltar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ulterior/DW	po:adjective
ínfimo/BW	po:adjective
arénteme/G	po:adjective po:noun po:adverb
caro/BW	po:adjective po:noun
fortifegador/CV	po:noun
frasion/DU	po:noun
garnèl/TU	po:noun
índexe/DI	po:noun
kaveƚo/T	po:noun
ƚetura/D	po:noun
ƚiberamente/IX	po:adverb
maƚamente/IX	po:adverb
masarol/TUV	po:noun
palatixasion/DU	po:noun
pantaƚon/CU	po:adjective
raro/BW	po:adjective
scòko/TI	po:noun
sentategamente/IX	po:adverb
soradòso/I	po:preposition po:adverb
spiovada/DY	po:noun
variasion/DU	po:noun
vedèl/BU	po:noun
anemèr/BV	po:noun
biskolamente/X	po:noun
bixékol/T	po:noun al:bixékoi
brontolon/CU	po:adjective po:noun
friso/TI	po:noun
furegon/DU	po:noun
granada/DY	po:noun
kabieta/D	po:noun
kaldierin/T	po:noun
kanevèr/BV	po:noun
lanèr/CV	po:noun
ƚavaduro/BY	po:noun
maƚedeto/BW	po:adjective
pasamanèr/CV	po:noun
pianđòto/BI	po:noun
poƚaceta/D	po:noun
rónkoƚo/T	po:noun
scopadura/DY	po:noun
skaveson/CU	po:adjective po:noun
straŧèr/BV	po:noun
stuèl/TU	po:noun
ŧiŧa/D	po:noun
xbavadura/DY	po:noun
xgangeratamente/IX	po:adverb
doloreto/TI	po:noun
fijoƚon/C	po:noun
